Hawaii statutes.
[PART IX.
TURTLE BAY, OAHU]

Note

Conditional repeal of L 2015, c 121 on January 1, 2016. L
2015, c 121, §17(1).

Revision Note

Part heading added by revisor.

[§171-171] Reimbursable general obligation
bonds for conservation easement and other real property interests in Turtle
Bay, Oahu. (a) The department of budget and finance shall issue
reimbursable general obligation bonds for the department of land and natural
resources to acquire a conservation easement and other real property interests
in Turtle Bay, Oahu, for the protection, preservation, and enhancement of
natural resources, while maintaining public access, as important to the
State. The public shall have perpetual public access to said conservation
easement. The conservation easement shall be in compliance with chapters
171 and 198. The other real property interests shall be in compliance with
chapter 171.

(b) For the purpose of this section, the
acquisition of the conservation easement and other real property interests
shall be deemed an undertaking under chapter 39.

(c) The reimbursable general obligation
bonds issued to acquire the conservation easement and other real property
interests shall be payable from the transient accommodations tax revenues
allocated to the Turtle Bay conservation easement special fund established by
section 171-172 and from moneys from the land conservation fund. The
transient accommodations tax revenues and moneys from the land conservation
fund are and shall be deemed user taxes. The revenues allocated shall be
deemed user taxes pursuant to chapter 39 for the undertaking.

(d) The reimbursable general obligation bonds
shall be issued in accordance with chapter 39. [L 2015, c 121, pt of §2]

Cross References

Land conservation fund, see §173A-5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next